Hawaii statutes.
§340F-4 Board of certification. (a) A
state board of certification of five members shall be appointed by the governor
to carry out this chapter. The board shall be placed, for administrative
purposes, in the department of health. The board shall consist of the
following:

(1) Four individuals who shall be duly qualified in
the fields of sanitary engineering or public water system operation; and

(2) One individual from the state agency responsible
for the State's safe drinking water program.

(b) The foregoing members shall serve for
four-year terms except that of the initial appointments, one shall be for one
year, one shall be for two years, one shall be for three years, and two shall
be for four years.

(c) The members of the board shall meet for an
organizational meeting at the call of the director, within forty-five days of
their appointment and thereafter at least twice a year at such time and place
as may be provided by rules and regulations adopted by them. The members of
the board shall annually elect one of the board members to serve as
chairperson. Additional meetings may be called by the chairperson as deemed
necessary. Notice of such meeting shall be given all members in writing at
least ten days prior to the date of the meeting.

(d) The governor shall fill any vacancy in the
board and may remove any member for cause.

(e) Board members shall be reimbursed for
expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. [L 1991, c 273, pt of §1;
am L 2000, c 196, §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next